Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB44.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definitions of "restaurant licensee" and "tavern" in section 902 of the act of December 19, 1988 (P.L.1262, No.156), known as the Local Option Small Games of Chance Act, are amended and the section is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 902. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *123456789101112131415161718192021 "Restaurant licensee." A for-profit hotel, restaurant, privately owned public golf course, brewpub [or], microbrewery or winery licensed to sell liquor under the act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code. The term does not include any of the following:(1) A grocery store.(2) A premises where the sale of liquid fuels or oil is conducted.(3) A winery that holds a license other than a limited winery license."Tavern." A for-profit hotel, restaurant, privately owned public golf course or brewpub [or], microbrewery or winery with a valid license to sell liquor, malt or brewed beverages under the act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code. The term does not include any of the following:(1) A grocery store.(2) A restaurant where the sale of liquid fuels or oil is conducted.(3) A hotel or restaurant whose place of business is located in a licensed facility as defined in 4 Pa.C.S. § 1103 (relating to definitions).(4) A business on the grounds of a facility where a Major League sports team conducts games or races.(5) A winery that holds a license other than a limited winery license.* * *"Winery." The term shall mean the same as under section 102 of the act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0044PN0023 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930